District of Columbia statutes.
48-921.01

Arrests, searches and seizures without warrant.

(a)

Repealed.

(b)

Arrests without a warrant, and searches of the person and seizures pursuant thereto, may be made for a violation of subsection (a) of this section hereof by police officers, as in the case of a felony, upon probable cause that the person arrested is violating such subsection at the time of his arrest.

(c)

No evidence discovered in the course of any such arrest, search, or seizure authorized by subsection (b) of this section hereof shall be admissible in any criminal proceeding against the person arrested unless at the time of such arrest he was violating the provisions of this section.

June 20, 1938, 52 Stat. 787, ch. 532, § 2
July 24, 1956, 70 Stat. 618, ch. 676, title III, § 301(b)
Aug. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 4-29, § 604(a)(3)
Mar. 16, 1982, D.C. Law 4-77, § 3, 29 DCR 46
1981 Ed., § 33-564.
1973 Ed., § 33-402.
Former § 33-502 was redesignated to be § 33-564 1981 Ed. upon enactment of D.C. Law 4-29.